src/morphology/affixes/prepositions.lexc
!! Prepositions
!! --------------------
!! The GERMAN language prepositions


LEXICON PR_ad__pr
+Pr+%<acc%>: # ;
LEXICON PR_ab__pr
+Pr+%<dat%>: # ;
LEXICON PR_abseits__pr
+Pr+%<gen%>: # ;
LEXICON PR_als__pr
+Pr+%<nom%>: # ;
LEXICON PR_an__pr
+Pr+%<acc%>: # ;
+Pr+%<dat%>: # ;
LEXICON PR_trotz__pr
+Pr+%<dat%>: # ;
+Pr+%<gen%>: # ;
LEXICON PR_exklusive__pprep
+Pr+%<acc%>: # ;
LEXICON PR_alledem__pprep
+Pr+%<dat%>: # ;
LEXICON PR_halber__pprep
+Pr+%<gen%>: # ;
LEXICON PR_entlang__pprep
+Pr+%<acc%>: # ;
+Pr+%<dat%>: # ;



!! Not definite
an+Pr:an # ;
auf+Pr:auf # ;
bei+Pr:bei # ;
hinter+Pr:hinter # ;
in+Pr:in # ;
über+Pr:über # ;
unter+Pr:unter # ;
von+Pr:von # ;
vor+Pr:vor # ;
zu+Pr:zu # ;




! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:
