src/morphology/stems/prepositions.lexc
LEXICON PP ! These are the indeclieable ones 
+Pr: #;

LEXICON Preposition
aus      PP ;
bei      PP ;
mit      PP ;
nach     PP ;
vor      PP ;
zu       PP ;

durch    PP ;
für      PP ;
gegen    PP ;
ohne     PP ;
um       PP ;
in 	 	 PP ;
unter    PP ;
gegen    PP ;
über     PP ;
zwischen PP ;
